Hawaii statutes.
[§353C-4.5] Correctional health care
program. There is established a correctional health care program within
the department. The administrator of the correctional health care program and
physicians who provide care to inmates shall be appointed by the director
without regard to [chapter 76]. [L 2001, c 154, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next